Utah statutes.
16-16-815.   Quorum.

(1)  Unless the articles of organization provide for a greater number, a majority of the total number of directors specified by the organic rules constitutes a quorum for a meeting of the directors.

(2)  If a quorum of the board of directors is present at the beginning of a meeting, any action taken by the directors present is valid even if withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being fewer than the number required for a quorum.

(3)  A director present at a meeting but objecting to notice under Subsection 16-16-814(2)(a) or (b) does not count toward a quorum.

